Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
457G

OCCUPATIONAL
THERAPY PRACTICE

Section

457G-1 Definitions

457G-1.2 Occupational therapy program

457G-1.3 Powers and duties of the director

457G-1.4 License required

457G-1.5 Practice of occupational therapy

457G-2 Qualifications of occupational therapists

457G-2.6 Qualifications of occupational therapy
assistants

457G-2.7 Supervision of occupational therapy
assistants;

partnership with occupational therapists

457G-3, 4 Repealed

457G-5 Exemptions

457G-6 Biennial renewal; failure to renew;
restoration,

inactive license; conversion from
registration

457G-7 License revocation or suspension;
reinstatement;

probation

Note

Licensing surcharge upon issuance of a new license and at
each license renewal period; cessation. L 2014, c 209, §9.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next